Washington statutes.
RCW 16.60.062

Assessing value of partition fence.

In assessing the value of any partition fence, the parties shall proceed as provided for the assessment of damages in RCW 16.60.020.

[Code 1881 s 2497; 1873 p 449 s 10; 1871 p 66 s 10; 1869 p 326 s 10; RRS s 5450.]